Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-434] Advisory council for adult and
community education. The board shall appoint an advisory council for adult
and community education composed of fifteen or more representatives of
industry, labor, civic organizations, and education. Appointments shall be for
a term of two years with reappointments optional but not to exceed a total of
six years on the advisory council. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next